Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB118.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 11(b) of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, is amended to read:Section 11. Penalties.* * *(b) Criminal penalties.--(1) Except as set forth under paragraph (2), a person that violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of [$500] $1,000 for each violation.(2) A person that, after being sentenced under paragraph (1), violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and 12345678910111213141516171819 shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of [$1,500] $3,000 for each violation or to imprisonment for not more than ten days, or both.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0118PN0100 - 2 - 12345